Hawaii statutes.
§662-9 Costs. In an action under this
chapter, court costs and fees as set by law may be allowed to the prevailing
party. [L 1957, c 312, pt of §1; Supp, §245A-9; HRS §662-9; am L 1972, c 164,
§2(c); am L 1979, c 152, §3]

Case Notes

This section and section 662-12 not inconsistent as to
attorney's fees. 51 H. 540, 465 P.2d 580.

Hawaii Legal Reporter Citations

Awarded. 77-1 HLR 77-267; 80-2 HLR 800964.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next